District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.33

Dome light and Taxicab Smart Meter System installation businesses.

No person or business shall violate or aid and abet a violation of public vehicle-for-hire laws, rules, and regulations applicable to the installation of a dome light or a Taxicab Smart-Meter System. The Commission shall have authority to determine, by rule, appropriate fines and penalties for violations of this section.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20n
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-270, § 2(l), 60 DCR 1717
2001 Ed., § 50-329.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-270 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see § 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-270 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7017 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-270, § 5.